Utah statutes.
34-20-5.   Labor relations board -- Offices -- Jurisdiction -- Member's participation in case.

The principal office of the board shall be at the state capitol, but it may meet and exercise any or all of its powers at any other place.  The board may, by one or more of its members or by the agents or agencies it may designate, prosecute any inquiry necessary to its functions in any part of the state.  A member who participates in the inquiry may not be disqualified from subsequently participating in a decision of the board in the same case.

